South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S709.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 38-53-10 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (16) "Director" means the Chief of the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division. SECTION 2.  Section 38-53-20 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 38-53-20.   The director or his designee, clerksClerks of court, and the State Law Enforcement Division have full power and authority to administer the provisions of this chapter for which they are charged with implementing. The director shall promulgate regulations to enforce the purposes and provisions of this chapter. The director may hire employees, examiners, investigators, and other assistants as he considers necessary and shall prescribe their duties. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----